Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-807
Signs or advertising on bridges or culverts; when unlawful.

It is hereby declared unlawful for any person or persons whether for himself, herself, or themselves or as the agent, servant, or employee of any firm, association, corporation, partnership, or limited liability company to post, paste, paint, tack, fasten or otherwise secure to any bridge or culvert in the State of Nebraska, any bills, billboards, signs, posters, advertisements, or banners of any matter or description whatsoever, whether of paper, metal, wood, or other composition. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit road markers designating a particular highway being painted on bridges and culverts.

Laws 1917, c. 186, § 1, p. 424;

C.S.1922, § 2756;

C.S.1929, § 39-842;

R.S.1943, § 39-807;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 208.